Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.120

Proceedings may be adjourned from time to time.

A court or judicial officer has power to adjourn any proceeding before it or him or her from time to time, as may be necessary, unless otherwise expressly provided by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 43; 1891 c 54 s 10; RRS s 66.]